Idaho statutes. Title 43 IRRIGATION DISTRICTS
Chapter 25 LOCAL IMPROVEMENT DISTRICTS
§ 43-2522. Liability of district.

The holder of any bond, issued under the authority of this code, shall have no claim therefor against the district by which the same is issued, except to the extent of the funds created and received by assessments for the applicable bond issue against the property within any local improvement district as herein provided and to the extent of the local improvement guarantee fund for the applicable bond issue which may be established by any such district under the provisions of this code, but the district shall be held responsible for the lawful levy of all special taxes or assessments herein provided and for the faithful accounting of settlements and payments of the special taxes and assessments levied for the payment of the bonds as herein provided. The owners and holders of such bonds shall be entitled to complete enforcement of all assessments made for the payment of such bonds. A copy of this section shall be plainly written, printed or engraved on the face of each bond so issued.

§ 43-2523. Bond and interest funds.

Once bonds are issued as provided herein, any funds paid as installment payments of assessments pledged to the payment of such bonds shall be kept in a fund known as the bond fund of the local improvement district and any funds paid as interest on said installment payments of assessments shall be kept in a fund known as the interest fund of the local improvement district. The funds shall be deposited in such bank or banks as are designated as depositors of public moneys of such irrigation districts under the laws of this state, or invested in bonds or warrants of the district. Interest received on such funds so deposited or invested shall be placed to the credit of the fund from which it is earned. Maturing bonds shall be paid from the bond fund and the interest on the bonds, when due, shall be paid from the interest fund. If there is sufficient money in the bond fund to pay the principal of one (1) or more bonds, the treasurer may call in and pay such bonds as of the next interest payment date in such manner as may be provided by the board at the time of the issuance of the bonds. The bonds to be called shall be selected by lot and shall, in the event less than all of the outstanding bonds are to be redeemed, insofar as can be done taking into consideration the denominations of the outstanding bonds, represent an equal amount of bonds from each maturity outstanding at the time of the redemption.

§ 43-2524. Reissue of bonds.

Where any bonds issued under this code are declared invalid or void by order or decree of court, which may be legally reissued, the board of such district shall, by resolution, provide for the reissuance thereof at the same rate of interest and in such amount as will cover the principal and interest due on said bonds, and the resolution providing for such reissue shall provide for the surrender and cancellation of such bonds upon which there has been a default or which have been declared invalid or void and the lien created by the levy of such assessment or assessments as herein provided shall not be deemed to have been lost or waived by such reissue but shall remain in full force and effect.

§ 43-2525. Rights against assessments.

The said bonds of any local improvement district as herein provided, when sold as hereinbefore provided, shall transfer to the owner or holder of such bonds all the rights and interest of such district in and with respect to every such assessment and the lien thereby created against the property of each owner assessed as shall not have availed himself of the provisions of this chapter, in regard to the redemption of his property as aforesaid, and shall authorize owners and holders of such bonds to receive and have collected the assessment or assessments embraced in any such bonds through any of the methods provided by law for the collection of assessments for local improvements.

Whenever any installment of an assessment or the interest thereon made for the payment of principal, or interest on such bonds so issued, is not paid when due and shall become delinquent, the district may by a resolution duly adopted declare all unpaid installments against any property to pay the cost and expenses of such improvement to be immediately due, payable and delinquent, and may thereupon cause a delinquency certificate to be issued against said property for the whole of the unpaid assessment against it in the manner hereinafter provided for issuance of delinquency certificates upon any installment of such assessment(s) becoming delinquent, and any such board must pass such resolution upon the written request of the holders of one-half (½) of any such bond issue, filed with the secretary.

§ 43-2526. Publication and conclusiveness of proceedings.

The board may provide for the publication of any resolution or other proceeding adopted by it pursuant to this code in the official newspaper of the district. For a period of thirty (30) days after such publication any person in interest shall have the right to contest the legality of such resolution or proceeding or any bonds which may be authorized thereby. No contest or proceeding to question the validity or legality of any resolution or proceeding, or any bonds which may be authorized thereby, passed or adopted under the provisions of this code shall be brought in any court by any person for any cause whatsoever, after the expiration of thirty (30) days from the date when the resolution or proceeding was published, and after such time the validity, legality and regularity of such resolution or proceeding or any bonds authorized thereby shall be conclusively presumed. If the question of validity of any bonds issued pursuant to this code is not raised within thirty (30) days from the date of publication of the resolution or proceeding issuing said bonds and fixing their terms, the authority to issue the bonds, the legality thereof and of the assessments necessary to pay the same shall be conclusively presumed and no court shall thereafter have authority to inquire into such matters.

§ 43-2527. Consolidated local improvement districts authorized.

Solely for the purpose of issuing bonds, registered warrants or interim warrants, the board of any district may authorize the establishment of consolidated local improvement districts. The original local improvement districts so consolidated need not be contiguous. If the board orders the creation of such consolidated local improvement districts, the moneys received from the installment payment of the principal of and interest on assessments levied within the original local improvement districts shall be deposited in a consolidated local improvement district bond fund and interest fund to be used to pay the principal of and interest on the outstanding consolidated local improvement district bonds or warrants.

§ 43-2528. Delinquent installments.

If any installment or payment is not made as provided hereinbefore and is in default, it shall then become delinquent.

§ 43-2529. Delinquent certificates.

As soon as any assessment or installment thereof, of any local improvement district shall become delinquent, the treasurer shall, if such assessment be collected in one (1) payment, mark the same delinquent on the assessment roll, or if for an installment of an assessment, on the local improvement installment docket, and shall add to the amount shown on said assessment roll, or installment docket, a penalty of two percent (2%) thereon. Within ten (10) days thereafter the treasurer shall prepare and issue to the district in which such local improvement district is located, a delinquency certificate to the property included in each such delinquent assessment or installment, which certificate shall have the force and effect of a sale of said property to the district for the amount of the delinquent assessment or installment plus penalty, said certificate shall bear date as of the time such assessment or installment became delinquent and shall be for the amount thereof plus the penalty charged thereon. Such certificate shall contain: the description of the property to be sold; the name of the person assessed, if known, or if unknown, that fact; the amount of the assessment or installment, plus penalty thereon; the number of the assessment and the name of the local improvement district in which assessed; and the date when such certificate will go to deed and shall bear interest from date thereof at the rate of ten percent (10%) per annum. Such certificates shall be made in duplicate, bound together in books in numerical order and filed in the office of the treasurer; provided, that after one (1) such certificate has been issued no further delinquency certificate shall be issued for subsequent installments of the same assessment, except as hereinafter provided, and whenever any subsequent installment shall thereafter become delinquent the treasurer shall so mark the same in the installment docket and add the penalty thereto, as hereinbefore provided, and the same shall draw interest at the rate of ten percent (10%) per annum from date of delinquency until the end of the month in which it is paid.

§ 43-2530. Delinquent certificate register.

Within twenty (20) days after preparing and issuing any delinquency certificate the treasurer shall enter the same in a book to be kept by said treasurer known as “Local Improvement District Delinquency Certificate Register,” which register shall contain, in proper columns: the number of the assessment; the name of the local improvement district in which assessed; name of the person to whom assessed, if known; description of the property sold, corresponding with the description in the certificate and the assessment roll; and the amount of assessment and penalty, and the treasurer must regularly number each entry in said register on the margin of said book and put a corresponding number on each original and duplicate delinquency certificate. Such register must contain blank spaces following each entry of a delinquency certificate therein, in which may be entered the name of an assignee thereof, the date of such assignment and the amount paid the assignee, the name of a redemptioner thereof, the date of such redemption and the amount paid by such redemptioner. Such book or register shall be retained by the treasurer and become a part of the records of his office. From and after entry in such register and until two (2) years from its date, any such certificate, unless redeemed, may be purchased from the treasurer in the manner hereinafter provided.

§ 43-2531. Assignment of delinquent certificates.

Whenever any person shall tender to the treasurer in cash the amount of any such certificate and interest thereon at the rate of ten percent (10%) per annum from date of such certificate to the end of the month in which such purchase is made, together with any subsequent installments then due with penalties and interest thereon, the treasurer shall assign such delinquency certificate to the purchaser by making and executing for and on behalf of the district the blank assignment on both the original and duplicate thereof, and shall deliver the original certificate so assigned to the purchaser. Whenever the purchaser shall be required to pay subsequent assessments in addition to the amount of such delinquency certificate, the fact of such payment and the amount thereof including penalty and interest, shall be endorsed on the original and duplicate certificate so assigned. Thereafter the treasurer shall immediately make the proper entries showing such assignment in the local improvement district delinquency register, and in the installment docket; provided, that past due interest coupons and past due bonds of the local improvement district for which such certificate was issued shall be received by the treasurer, at par and accrued interest in payment of such certificates. Such bonds and coupons shall be forthwith cancelled by the treasurer.

§ 43-2532. Form of assignment — Assignment by purchaser.

The assignment prescribed by the preceding section must be substantially in the following form, and endorsed on the certificate:

§ 43-2533. Redemption.

At any time within two (2) years from the date of any delinquency certificate, the owner of the property described therein, or anyone on his behalf, may redeem such property by paying to the treasurer the amount stated in such certificate together with interest thereon at the rate of ten percent (10%) per annum, from date thereof to the last day of the month in which such redemption is made. Thereupon the treasurer shall issue to the redemptioner a certificate of redemption which shall state the name of the redemptioner, the date of redemption, the number of the certificate so redeemed, the description of the property contained therein, and the name of the local improvement district for which said certificate was issued. In case said certificate has not been assigned, the treasurer shall note such upon the original and duplicate delinquency certificate; if assigned upon the duplicate certificate the fact that the same has been redeemed, the date of redemption and shall note the same upon the local improvement delinquency certificate register and the local improvement installment docket; provided, that no redemption of any such certificate shall be allowed unless all assessments which have become due subsequent to the one for which said delinquency certificate shall have been issued with penalties, and interest at the rate of ten percent (10%) per annum from date of said delinquency to the end of the month in which the same is redeemed, shall be paid, which fact together with the amount paid shall be stated upon the redemption certificate. The money received from the redemption of any property described in a certificate which has been assigned shall be deposited by the treasurer to the credit of the person named in the last assignment of such certificate. The treasurer shall thereupon give notice to such person at the address shown by the record of such deposit, and such person shall thereafter be paid the same by the treasurer, without additional interest, upon surrender of such certificate to the treasurer who shall mark the same “paid” and hold it as a voucher.

§ 43-2534. Deed.

If the property described in any delinquency certificate is not redeemed within two (2) years from the date thereof, the treasurer, after having given notice as hereinafter required, shall issue a deed thereto to the district, or if the same has been assigned as hereinbefore provided, then to the person holding the original delinquency certificate under assignment, upon request therefor, and upon the delivery to the treasurer of such original certificate and filing proof of having given notice as required by the treasurer before making a deed to the district. Such deed shall recite substantially the matter contained in the certificate and that no person redeemed the property within the time allowed, by law, for its redemption. It shall be signed and acknowledged by the treasurer in the manner required, by law, to entitle the same to be recorded under the laws of this state; provided, that such deed shall not be issued to an assignee until he has paid all subsequent installments and assessments of the local improvement district then delinquent or due upon the property described in the delinquency certificate, together with the penalties and interest thereon. Such deed to an assignee shall be made subject to all unpaid installments not then due and subject to all regular or special assessments of the district, not related to the local improvement district.

§ 43-2535. Notice of expiration of time of redemption.

The treasurer shall, at least one (1) month and not more than three (3) months before the expiration of the time of redemption of any property, serve or cause to be served, a written or printed, or partly written and partly printed, notice on the person or persons in the actual possession or occupancy of such land or lots, and shall also, within the same time, serve upon or mail to, the person in whose name the same stands upon the assessment records in the county assessor’s office, a copy of said notice; which notice shall state when the delinquency certificate was made, in whose name the property was assessed, the description of the land or lots, the name of the local improvement district for which assessed, the amount of the assessment or installment, and when the time of redemption will expire. The treasurer shall, at the same time, send a similar notice, by mail, to each mortgagee or other holder of a recorded lien against such land, in each case where such mortgagee or lienholder has previously filed in the office of the treasurer a written request for such notice and paid the fee therefor, which request shall include the name and address of the mortgagee, the name of the reputed owner of the land, a description of the land and the date of the expiration of the mortgage or lien; no notice need be sent after the date of expiration, unless a further request therefor be duly filed. If the mortgagee or lienholder shall furnish a duplicate form of request for that purpose the treasurer shall certify thereon to the filing of the request and deliver the same to the party filing it. If there is no person in actual possession or occupancy of such land or lot and if the persons in whose name it stands, upon diligent inquiry cannot be found in the state, then the treasurer shall, within the same time, post or have posted, a copy of said notice in a conspicuous place upon said land or lots and in a substantial manner.

Whenever any notice is mailed, as herein required, the fact that the addressee does not receive it shall not in any manner invalidate or affect the proceedings herein provided.

§ 43-2536. Proof of notice.

The treasurer shall, before issuing any deed to the district, make and file his affidavit showing a full compliance with the requirements of the preceding section [43-2535, Idaho Code,] as to giving notice of the expiration of the period of redemption; before issuing a deed to the holder of any delinquency certificate, the treasurer shall require that affidavits be filed showing a complete compliance with the provisions of the previous section as to giving such notice. Such proof shall be filed in the office of the treasurer and remain a permanent record in such office. Any person making a false affidavit as to any fact required herein shall be guilty of perjury.

§ 43-2537. Effect of deed as evidence.

The matters recited in the delinquency certificate must be recited in the deed and such deed duly acknowledged or proved shall be prima facie evidence:

That the local improvement district was created, the assessment made and the work and improvement done in the manner provided by law;

That all notices were given, all hearings were had, orders made and resolutions passed and adopted required by law, and that all the proceedings up to the execution and delivery of such deed were had and done in the manner required by law;

That the assessments were not paid, the delinquency entries were properly made and delinquency certificate properly issued, as prescribed by law, and by the proper officer;

That the property was not redeemed, that the notice required to be given before deed was taken was properly given as required by law, and that the person who executed the deed was the proper officer.

§ 43-2538. Delinquency certificate for subsequent installments.

Whenever any delinquency certificate has been assigned, as hereinbefore provided, and the time for redemption has expired and there are outstanding, against the property covered by said certificate, any delinquent installments subsequent in time to the installment for which the property was sold, then the treasurer shall issue to the district a delinquency certificate for such past due installments in the same manner, as hereinbefore provided, and shall cancel the previous delinquency certificate and the same shall be of no further force and effect. Such delinquency certificate for subsequent installments may be assigned in the same manner, as hereinbefore provided, and have the same force and effect.

§ 43-2539. Fees of treasurer.

The treasurer shall receive the following fees, which, when paid, shall be credited to the general fund of the district: for issuing any delinquency certificate ten dollars ($10.00) to be included in the amount of the certificate; for making any deed ten dollars ($10.00), to be paid by the person to whom made; for giving notice to a mortgagee or lienholder five dollars ($5.00), to be paid by such person; for giving notice of expiration of period of redemption five dollars ($5.00). In all cases where the property is deeded to the district the fees shall be charged to the amount for which the deed is taken and shall be paid upon the sale of the property, or the sale of the delinquency certificate.

§ 43-2540. Suit to quiet title.

Whenever the necessary costs and attorney’s fees have been advanced by the holders of the bonds of the district or any prospective purchaser or other person, it shall be the duty of the board of such district to cause the attorney for the district to commence suit to quiet title to the property described in said deed in the name of the district and to secure the possession of the property; provided, that the property described in any number of tax deeds so made to the district and against any number of owners of property may be included in the same suit.

§ 43-2541. Sale of property deeded to district.

At any time after acquiring title and possession of any property, as hereinbefore provided, the district may sell such property to any purchaser upon receiving therefor a sum not less than the amount for which the property was sold to the district and by the payment of all installments of assessments subsequent to the one (1) for which such property was sold and then due together with the penalties and interest thereon. The purchaser shall take such property subject to any unpaid general taxes and assessments and to all local improvement district installments not then due, and the district shall thereafter collect such installments in the manner provided by this code. When such purchase is made and the money paid therefor, the district shall issue a deed to the purchaser signed by the president and attested by the secretary, which deed shall be executed and acknowledged in the manner required, by law, to entitle the same to be recorded under the laws of this state.

In selling such property and in conveying title thereto the provisions of sections 43-1508 and 43-1509, Idaho Code, shall not apply and compliance with the procedures set forth in section 43-318, Idaho Code, shall not be required, but no conveyance under this section shall be valid unless it be approved by an affirmative vote of more than one-half (½) of the full board.

§ 43-2542. Sale of property after maturity of bonds.

Within thirty (30) days after the maturity of the last installment of any issue of bonds of a local improvement district, if any such bonds or interest coupons shall remain unpaid, any property remaining unsold, to which the district has taken title by reason of assessment of such local improvement district, shall be appraised and immediately after said appraisement such property shall be offered for sale by giving notice of the time and place of sale thereof by publication of such notice in a newspaper published in the district for ten (10) consecutive issues if a daily paper, or in two (2) consecutive issues if a weekly paper, or if there be no newspaper published in such district then in a newspaper having general circulation therein, the date of sale to be not less than twenty (20) days from the date of the first publication of such notice. At the time and place designated in the notice the treasurer shall offer such property for sale to the highest bidder, but no sale shall be made for less than the appraised value. If no bid be received for a sum equal to or greater than the appraised value, then the sale may be postponed for not to exceed thirty (30) days, and shall be readvertised, and at the time to which such sale was postponed shall again be offered for sale and sold to the highest bidder. Upon the sale of any property and the payment therefor, a deed shall be executed to the purchaser in the same manner, as provided for the execution of deeds in section 43-2541, Idaho Code.

§ 43-2543. Disposition of funds.

All money received by the treasurer on account of the payment of assessments or installments thereof, the assignment or redemption of delinquency certificates, or for rents, issues and profits, or from the sale of any property, title to which is held by the district for the benefit of any local improvement district, less any expenses of securing possession of said property, or for the care and operation and sale of the same, shall be deposited to the credit of the interest fund and bond fund of the local improvement district, in the same proportion as the assessment or installments for which the property was taken. Any money left in a local improvement district interest or bond fund or any money derived from the rental or sale of any real property acquired by the district through the sale for delinquent assessments or installments shall, after all warrants, bonds and coupons of said local improvement district have been paid in full, be credited to the general fund of the district.

§ 43-2544. Delinquent certificate not assignable during pendency of action.

No certificate of delinquency as hereinbefore provided, shall be assigned, or any property sold, to which the district has taken a deed, on account of any assessment, or installment thereof, during the pendency of any proceeding in court challenging the validity of such assessment.

§ 43-2545. Duties of officers.

When the board shall decide that it is to the best interest of the district that the duties in this code designated to be performed by the treasurer should be done and performed by the secretary of such district, they may at their option, by resolution, duly presented and approved by such board assign such duties to the secretary of such district; provided, that the duty of receiving any funds collected by the secretary and the depositing and disbursing of such funds by order of the board shall always be and remain the duty and responsibility of the treasurer. The board shall, in said resolution, devise a proper system or plan whereby the secretary may pay to the treasurer all moneys collected by him and take receipts therefor.

§ 43-2546. Local improvement guarantee fund — Creation of fund.

Any district may by resolution of appropriation or by levy of a tax of not to exceed one (1) mill in any one (1) year upon the lots or lands in the local improvement district, or by appropriation from such other sources of the local improvement district as may be determined by the board, create a fund for the purpose of guaranteeing, to the extent of such fund, the payment of bonds or warrants and interest thereon, hereafter issued against any local improvements therein; provided, that such sum so levied or appropriated in any year shall be more than sufficient to pay the outstanding warrants of said fund and to establish therein a balance, which combined levy and appropriation in any one (1) year shall not exceed five percent (5%) of the outstanding obligations thereby guaranteed; provided further, that the board shall not levy any tax as herein provided when the amount of moneys in the local improvement guarantee fund equals ten percent (10%) of the total outstanding obligations thereby guaranteed. The tax levies herein authorized and directed shall be additional to and, if need be, in excess of any and all statutory limitations. The fund so created shall be designated local improvement guarantee fund.

§ 43-2547. Bonds, warrants and coupons, when paid out of fund — Nonpayment for want of funds — Interest.

Whenever any district has established such local improvement guarantee fund, and any bond, warrant or coupon drawn against any local improvement fund is presented to the district for payment and there is not sufficient amount in said local improvement fund against which to draw to pay the same, unless otherwise requested by the holder, payment therefor shall be made by warrant drawn against the local improvement guarantee fund. Such warrants when presented to the treasurer for payment, if not paid, shall be registered and draw interest at a rate as may be fixed by the board. Neither the holder nor the owner of any bond or warrant issued under the provisions of this act shall have any claim therefor, except for payment from the special assessments made for the improvement for which said bond or warrant was issued, and except as against the local improvement guarantee fund herein provided, and the district shall not be liable to any holder or owner of such bond or warrant for any loss to the guarantee fund occurring in the lawful operation thereof by the district.

§ 43-2548. Subrogation of district to rights of payee — Surplus funds — Payment into fund — Preferences.

Whenever there shall be paid out of the local improvement guarantee fund, any sum on account of principal or interest of a local improvement bond or warrant, the district, as trustee for the fund, shall be subrogated to all the rights of the holder of the bond or interest coupon or warrant so paid, and the policies thereof, or the assessment underlying the same, shall become part of the guarantee fund. There shall be paid into the guarantee fund any surplus remaining in any local improvement fund after the payment of all outstanding bonds or warrants, payable out of such local improvement fund. Bonds or warrants guaranteed by such fund shall have no preference except in the order of presentation for payment.

§ 43-2549. Maintenance and operation and sources of fund.

The board shall prescribe rules and regulations for the maintenance and operation of the guarantee fund not inconsistent herewith. After the creation of such fund, all money derived from the assignment of delinquency certificates, redemptions, sale of property under foreclosure for delinquent local improvement district assessments or from the rent or sale of property, title to which has been obtained by the district pursuant to this code, shall be paid into the local improvement guarantee fund, and all delinquency certificates issued and such property acquired shall be held by the district for the benefit of such guarantee fund. Money from the guarantee fund may be used to redeem property subject to local improvement assessments from general tax delinquencies, underlying bonds or warrants guaranteed by the fund, or to purchase such property at county tax sales or otherwise, from the county for the purpose of protecting the guarantee fund. After so acquiring title to real property, the district may lease or sell and convey the same for such price and on such terms as may be determined by the board, any provision of law or resolution to the contrary notwithstanding, and all proceeds resulting therefrom shall belong to and be paid into the guarantee fund, provided however, that in the event the district purchases such property at tax sale or otherwise it shall not be sold for a lesser sum than the district paid therefor.

§ 43-2550. Replenishment of fund — Warrants — Issuance against fund — Tax levy.

Whenever there is not a sufficient amount of cash in said local improvement guarantee fund, at any time to pay any and all warrants, together with interest thereon, drawn against said fund, the board may replenish said local improvement guarantee fund by transferring or appropriating to it, moneys from the general fund of the district or other available sources, as may be determined by said board, subject however, to the limitations herein prescribed. Warrants drawing interest, as herein provided, may be issued against said local improvement guarantee fund to meet any financial liability against it; but at the time of making its next annual levy upon lots or lands in the local improvement district, the district shall provide for the levy of a sum sufficient with other resources of the guarantee fund to pay warrants so issued and outstanding, the tax for this purpose not to exceed one (1) mill, based on the market value fixed by the county assessor in any one (1) year.

§ 43-2551. Bonds and warrants — Revenues from which payable.

The holder or owner of any local improvement bond or warrant shall have no claim thereon against the district by which the same is issued, except to the extent of the funds created and received by assessments against the property within any local improvement district and to the extent of his pro rata share of any local improvement guarantee fund, authorized and created under the provisions of this chapter.

§ 43-2552. Bonds payable from fund.

Whenever a district has created a local improvement guarantee fund, under the provisions of this act, any local improvement district bonds issued thereafter shall provide that the principal sum of such bonds and the interest thereon shall be payable out of the local improvement fund created for the payment of cost and expenses of the improvement or out of any local improvement guarantee fund, duly authorized and created, and not otherwise.

§ 43-2553. Excess in fund — Disposition.

When a local improvement guarantee fund duly created in any district exceeds in amount of moneys held therein by ten percent (10%) of the total outstanding obligations thereby guaranteed, then the board may, by resolution, authorize the treasurer or appropriate official of said district to return and pay such said excess or any part thereof to the general fund of said district to return and pay from such said excess or any designated part thereof all or any part of local improvement district bonds of said district then issued and outstanding or to be issued. The passage of such resolution shall require the affirmative vote of at least two-thirds (2/3) of the full board.

§ 43-2554. Reserve fund authorized.

For the purpose of securing the payment of the principal of and interest on an issue of local improvement bonds, notes, warrants or other short-term obligations, the board may create a reserve fund for each obligation in addition to or in lieu of a guarantee fund. The reserve fund shall be separate and apart from any guarantee fund and in an amount not exceeding ten percent (10%) of the principal amount of the bonds, notes or warrants issued. The cost of a reserve fund may be included in the cost and expense of any local improvement for assessment against the property in the local improvement district to pay the cost, or any part thereof. The reserve fund may be funded from the proceeds of the bonds, notes, warrants, or other short-term obligations, from special assessment payments, or from any other money legally available therefor. Reserve fund balances in excess of ten per cent [percent] (10%) of the principal amount of the bonds outstanding shall be used to reduce the annual assessments of those participants in the respective local improvement district whose prior assessments have been paid. Whenever the reserve fund is insufficient to meet claims for payment of principal and interest against the reserve fund, the board may appropriate funds from such other legally available sources of the local improvement district as may be determined by the board.